North Dakota statutes. TITLE 38 Mining and Gas and Oil Production
CHAPTER 38-14.1 Surface Mining and Reclamation Operations
38-14.1-14.
Permit applications — Mining and reclamation plans.

The permit application must be submitted in a manner satisfactory to the commission and must contain among other things:

A legal description of the land for which a permit is sought, so that it may be identified and distinguished from other lands.

An identification of all lands, interests in lands, or options on such interests (both surface and subsurface) held by the applicant or pending bids on interests in lands by the applicant, which lands are contiguous to the area to be covered by the permit.

The names and addresses of all of the following:

The permit applicant.

Every legal or equitable owner of record (surface and subsurface) of the property for which a permit is sought.

The holders of record (surface and subsurface) of any leasehold interest in the property.

Any purchaser of record (surface and subsurface) of the property under a real estate contract.

The operator, if the operator is a person different from the permit applicant.

If any of these are business entities other than a single proprietor, the names and addresses of the principals, officers, and resident agent.

The names and addresses of the owners of record of all surface and subsurface areas adjacent to any part of the permit area as prescribed by the commission by regulation.

If the applicant is a partnership, corporation, limited liability company, association, or other business entity, the following where applicable:

The names and addresses of every officer, manager, partner, director, governor, or person performing a function similar to a director, of the permit applicant.

The name and address of any person owning of record ten percent or more of any class of voting stock or membership interests of the applicant.

A list of all names under which the applicant, partner, principal shareholder, or principal member previously operated a surface coal mining operation within any state within the five-year period preceding the date of the application.

A statement of any current or previous surface coal mining permits in any state held by the applicant and the permit identification for said permits and for each pending application.

A schedule listing any and all notices of violation of this chapter, the Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977 [Pub. L. 95-87; 91 Stat. 445; 30 U.S.C. 1201 et seq.], and any law, rule, or regulation of the United States or of the state of North Dakota, or of any department or agency in the United States or of the state of North Dakota pertaining to air or water environmental protection incurred by the applicant in connection with any surface coal mining operation during the three-year period prior to the date of application. The schedule must also indicate the final resolution of any such notice of violation.

A statement of whether the permit applicant, any subsidiary, affiliate, or persons controlled by or under common control with the permit applicant, has ever held any federal or state mining permit which in the five-year period prior to the date of submission of the application has been suspended or revoked, or has had a mining bond or similar security deposited in lieu of bond forfeited and, if so, a brief explanation of the facts involved.

A copy of the permit applicant’s advertisement as required in section 38-14.1-18.

A map or plan, to an appropriate scale, clearly showing the land to be affected within the permit area upon which the applicant has the legal right to enter and commence surface coal mining operations.

A copy of those documents upon which the permit applicant bases the applicant’s legal right to enter and commence surface coal mining operations and whether that right is the subject of pending court litigation.

A description of the type and method of surface coal mining operation that exists or is proposed, the engineering techniques proposed or used, and the equipment used or proposed to be used.

The anticipated or actual starting and termination dates of each phase of the mining operations.

The name of the watershed and location of the surface stream or tributary into which surface and pit drainage will be discharged, including the drainage permit application to the department of water resources, if required.

A determination by the permit applicant of the probable hydrologic consequences of the mining and reclamation operations, both on and off the minesite, with respect to the hydrologic regime, quantity and quality of water in surface and ground water systems, including the dissolved and suspended solids under seasonal flow conditions and the collection of sufficient data for the minesite and surrounding areas so that an assessment can be made by the commission of the probable cumulative impacts of all anticipated mining in the area upon the hydrology of the area and particularly upon water availability.

The climatological factors that are peculiar to the locality of the land to be affected, including the average seasonal precipitation, the average direction and velocity of prevailing winds, and the seasonal temperature ranges.

Topographic maps to an appropriate scale, as prescribed by the commission by regulation, clearly showing the land to be affected as of the date of the application. Such a map, among other things specified by the commission, must show all of the following information:

All manmade features.

All boundaries of the land to be affected.

The boundary lines and names of present owners of record of all surface areas abutting the permit area.

The location of all buildings within one-half mile [804.67 meters] of the permit area.

Cross sections, maps or plans of the land to be affected, including the actual area to be mined, prepared by or under the direction of and certified by a registered professional engineer, a registered land surveyor, or a qualified professional geologist with assistance from experts in related fields, showing pertinent elevation and location of test borings or core samplings and depicting all of the following information:

The nature and depth of the various strata of overburden.

The location of subsurface water, if encountered, and its quality.

The nature and thickness of any coal, commercial leonardite, or rider seam above the coal or commercial leonardite seam to be mined.

The nature of the stratum immediately beneath the coal or commercial leonardite seam to be mined.

All mineral crop lines and the strike and dip of the coal or commercial leonardite to be mined, within the area of land to be affected.

Existing or previous surface mining limits.

The location and extent of known workings of any underground mines, including mine openings to the surface.

The location of aquifers.

The estimated elevation of the water table.

The location of spoil, waste, or refuse areas, suitable plant growth material stockpiling areas and, if necessary, stockpiling areas for other suitable strata.

The location of all impoundments for waste or erosion control.

Any settling or water treatment facility.

Constructed or natural drainways and the location of any discharges to any surface body of water on the area of land to be affected or adjacent thereto.

Profiles at appropriate cross sections of the anticipated final surface configuration that will be achieved pursuant to the applicant’s proposed reclamation plan.

A statement by the applicant of the result of test borings or core samplings from the permit area, including logs of the drill holes, the thickness of the coal or commercial leonardite seam found, an analysis of the chemical properties of such coal or commercial leonardite, the sulfur content of any coal or commercial leonardite seam, chemical analysis of potentially toxic forming sections of the overburden, and chemical analysis of the stratum lying immediately underneath the coal or commercial leonardite to be mined. The provisions of this subdivision may be waived by the commission with respect to the specific application by a written determination that such requirements are unnecessary.

A soil survey of all the suitable plant growth material within the permit area. Such survey must also locate and identify prime soils in the permit area. The survey must be made by a professional soil classifier as described in subsection 4 of section 43-36-01.

Cultural resource information, including all of the following:

A statement evidencing compliance with the requirements of chapter 55-03.

A cultural resource inventory, including all buildings, structures, and objects referred to in section 55-03-01, covering the proposed permit and adjacent area conducted in accordance with guidelines developed by the state historic preservation office and the director of the state historical society.

An evaluation of each cultural resource site which will be affected by any surface coal mining and reclamation operation. The evaluation must include sufficient information to allow the director to determine if the cultural resource site is significant in accordance with the national register criteria [36 CFR 60.4] and guidelines established by the director.

An appropriately scaled map identifying the location of each cultural resource site determined significant by the director within the proposed permit area and the adjacent area.

A description of adverse effects on significant cultural resources that may result from the proposed surface coal mining operations.

A statement that the permit applicant will inform the director and the commission of any discovery within the permitted area of previously unrecorded archaeological, cultural, or historic materials and allow reasonable time for the director to determine the significance of the discovery and, if determined significant, to approve a mitigation plan.

A plan approved by the director that has been or will be used to mitigate adverse effects on significant sites that are known, or a statement that such a plan will be approved and implemented before any adverse effects. Any mitigation plan that has not begun implementation within five years of plan approval is subject to review by the director.

Each applicant for a permit shall submit as part of the permit application a reclamation plan that must include, in the degree of detail necessary to demonstrate that reclamation as required by this chapter can be accomplished, a statement of:

The condition of the land to be covered by the permit prior to any mining, including all of the following:

The uses existing at the time of the application, and if the land has a history of previous mining, the uses which preceded any mining.

The capability of the land prior to any mining to support a variety of uses giving consideration to soil and foundation characteristics, topography, vegetative cover, and the soil survey prepared pursuant to subdivision t of subsection 1.

The productivity of the land prior to mining, including appropriate identification of prime farmlands, as well as the average yield of food, fiber, and forage products from such lands obtained under high levels of management.

The use which is proposed to be made of the land following reclamation, including a discussion of the utility and capacity of the reclaimed land to support a variety of alternative uses and the relationship of such use to existing land use policies and plans, the surface owner’s preferred use, and the comments of state and local governments or agencies thereof, which would have to initiate, implement, approve, or authorize the proposed use of the land following reclamation.

The consideration which has been given to maximize the utilization and conservation of the coal or commercial leonardite being recovered so that re-affecting the land in the future can be minimized.

The consideration which has been given to making the surface mining and reclamation operations consistent with surface owner plans and applicable state and local land use plans and programs.

The consideration which has been given to developing the reclamation plan in a manner consistent with local physical, environmental, and climatological conditions, including the use made of hydrologic and geochemical information in addressing problems of subsurface drainage and stability.

A detailed description of how the proposed postmining land use is to be achieved and the necessary support activities which may be needed to achieve the proposed land use.

The engineering techniques proposed to be used in mining and reclamation and a description of the major equipment.

Plans for:

The control of surface water drainage and of water accumulation.

Backfilling, soil stabilization, compacting, grading, and appropriate revegetation.

Soil reconstruction, replacement, and stabilization, pursuant to the performance standards in subsections 5 and 6 of section 38-14.1-24.

A detailed description of the measures to be taken during the mining and reclamation process to assure the protection of:

The quality of surface and ground water systems, both onsite and offsite, from adverse effects of the mining and reclamation process.

The rights of present users to such water.

The quantity of surface and ground water systems, both onsite and offsite, from adverse effects of the mining and reclamation process or to provide alternative sources of water where such protection of quantity cannot be assured.

The steps to be taken to comply with applicable air quality and water quality and quantity laws and regulations and any applicable health and safety standards.

A detailed estimated timetable for the accomplishment of each major step in the reclamation plan.

An estimate of the cost per acre [.40 hectare] of the reclamation, including a statement as to how the applicant plans to comply with each of the requirements set out in section 38-14.1-24.

The results of test borings which the applicant has made of the area to be covered by the permit, or other equivalent information and data, in a form satisfactory to the commission, including the location of subsurface water and an analysis of the chemical properties, including toxic forming properties of the mineral and overburden.

Each applicant for a permit shall submit to the commission as part of the permit application a certificate issued by an insurance company authorized to do business in this state certifying that the applicant has a public liability insurance policy in force for the surface coal mining and reclamation operations for which such permit is sought. Such policy must provide for personal injury and property damage protection in an amount adequate to compensate any persons, except employees covered by workforce safety and insurance pursuant to chapter 65-01, damaged as a result of surface coal mining and reclamation operations, including use of explosives, and entitled to compensation under the applicable provisions of state law. Such policy must be maintained in full force and effect during the terms of the permit or any renewal, including the length of all reclamation operations. The policy must include a rider requiring that the insurer notify the commission whenever substantive changes are made in the policy, including any termination or failure to renew. All operations must cease if the policy is terminated or is not renewed.

Each applicant for a surface coal mining and reclamation permit shall submit to the commission as part of the permit application a blasting plan which must outline the procedures and standards by which the permittee will meet the provisions of subsection 13 of section 38-14.1-24.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 399, § 1; 1981, ch. 370, § 2; 1985, ch. 407, § 1; 1985, ch. 408, § 1; 1985, ch. 409, §§ 1, 3; 1989, ch. 69, § 40; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 2001, ch. 503, § 5; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2015, ch. 257, §§ 10, 11; 2021, ch. 488, § 16, effective August 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by sections 10 and 11 of chapter 257, S.L. 2015 became effective July 1, 2015.

Note.

Section 38-14.1-14 was amended 2 times by the 2015 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 11 of Chapter 257, Session Laws 2015, Senate Bill 2377; and Chapter 257, Session Laws 2015, Senate Bill 2377.

Collateral References.

Statutory or contractual obligation to restore surface after strip or surface mining, 1 A.L.R.2d 575.

38-14.1-15.
Permit applications — Extended mining plan.

An applicant shall submit as part of a permit application a plan identifying the lands subject to surface coal mining operations over the estimated life of those operations and the size, sequence, and timing of the subareas for which it is anticipated that individual permits will be sought.

The permittee shall annually advise the commission of the status of the plan and shall amend such plan if changes are made in anticipated mining operations or if updated information is available.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 399, § 1; 1981, ch. 370, § 3.

38-14.1-16.
Performance bond — Amount — Sufficiency of surety — Amount of forfeiture.

As part of a surface coal mining and reclamation permit application, the permit applicant shall file with the commission, on a form prescribed and furnished by the commission, a bond for performance payable to the state of North Dakota and conditional upon faithful performance of all the requirements of this chapter and the requirements of all regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter and all permit terms and conditions.

The commission shall set the bond amount sufficient to complete the reclamation plan in event of forfeiture. The bond for the permit area must be at least ten thousand dollars.

The bond must cover that area of land within the permit area upon which the permittee will initiate and conduct surface coal mining and reclamation operations for the ensuing year. Prior to initiating and conducting succeeding increments of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within the permit area, the permittee shall file with the commission an additional bond or bonds to cover such increments in accordance with this section.

Liability under the bond, subject to allowable releases under subsection 7 of section 38-14.1-17, is for the duration of the surface coal mining and reclamation operation and for a period coincident with the permittee’s responsibility for revegetation requirements in subsection 18 of section 38-14.1-24 and until such time as the lands included in the surface coal mining operation have been approved and released by the commission. The bond must be executed by the permit applicant and a corporate surety licensed to do business in North Dakota, except that the permit applicant may elect to deposit cash, negotiable bonds of the United States or of North Dakota, or negotiable certificates of deposit of any bank organized or transacting business in the state. The cash deposit or market value of such securities must be equal to or greater than the amount of the bond required for the bonded area.

Cash or securities so deposited must be deposited upon the same terms as the terms upon which surety bonds may be deposited. Such securities are security for the repayment of such negotiable certificate of deposit.

A bond filed as prescribed in subsection 2 for areas not yet affected by surface coal mining and reclamation operations may not be canceled by the surety unless it shall give not less than ninety days’ notice to the commission. For lands on which surface coal mining and reclamation operations are being conducted, the bond may not be canceled by the surety unless a substitute surety assuming liability from the initiation of such operations is obtained and is approved by the commission.

If the corporate surety’s license is suspended or revoked, the permittee, after notice from the commission, shall provide a substitute performance bond. If the permittee fails to make substitution within thirty days, the commission may suspend the permit. If substitution is not made within ninety days, the commission shall suspend the permit.

The commission may accept the bond of the permit applicant itself without separate surety when the permit applicant demonstrates to the satisfaction of the commission the existence of a suitable agent to receive service of process and a history of financial solvency and continuous operation sufficient for authorization to self-insure or bond such amount.

The amount of the bond or deposit required and the terms of each acceptance of the permit applicant’s bond must be adjusted by the commission from time to time as acreages [hectarages] affected by surface coal mining operations are increased or decreased or where the cost of future reclamation changes.

The amount of any forfeiture of the bond or security must be the amount prescribed in the permit for each acre [.40 hectare] or portion thereof on which surface coal mining and reclamation operations are being conducted.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 399, § 1; 1987, ch. 436, § 1.

38-14.1-17.
Release of performance bond — Schedule — Notification — Public hearing.

The permittee may file a request with the commission for the release of all or part of a performance bond or deposit furnished subsequent to July 1, 1975. As part of any bond release application, the permittee shall submit:

Within thirty days after filing of the request, a copy of an advertisement placed at least once a week for four successive weeks in the official newspaper of each county in which the surface coal mining operation is located. The advertisement must contain notification of all of the following:

The precise location and the number of acres [hectares] of the land affected.

The permit and the date approved.

The amount of the bond filed and the portion sought to be released.

The type and approximate dates of reclamation work performed and a description of the results achieved as they relate to the permittee’s approved reclamation plan.

The right to file written objections and to request a public hearing or an informal conference as specified in subsection 2.

Copies of letters which the permittee has sent to all owners of surface rights within the permit area proposed for bond release, adjoining property owners, state agencies specified in subsection 2 of section 38-14.1-21, heads of local governmental bodies, including the county commissioners and mayors of municipalities, planning agencies, sewage and water treatment authorities, and water companies in the locality in which the surface coal mining and reclamation operations took place, notifying them of the permittee’s intention to seek release from the bond. The letters must also contain notice of the right to file written objections and request an informal conference or a public hearing as specified in subsection 2.

Any person having a valid legal interest which is or may be adversely affected by release of the bond or the responsible officer or head of any state or local governmental agency which has jurisdiction by law or special expertise with respect to any environmental, social, or economic impact involved in the surface coal mining operation or is authorized to develop and enforce environmental standards with respect to such operations has the right to file written objections to the proposed release from bond with the commission and to request an informal conference pursuant to the procedures established in section 38-14.1-19 or a public hearing pursuant to procedures established in subsection 3 of section 38-14.1-30 within thirty days after the last publication of the notice required in subsection 1.

Upon receipt of the application for bond release, the commission shall, within thirty days, conduct an inspection and evaluation of the reclamation work involved. Such evaluation must consider, among other things, all of the following:

The degree of difficulty to complete any remaining reclamation.

Whether pollution of surface and subsurface water is occurring.

The probability of continuance or future occurrence of such pollution.

The estimated cost of abating such pollution.

The effectiveness of soil erosion control measures employed.

The level of bonding.

Time periods established by subsection 3 do not apply if effective inspections cannot be carried out because of inclement weather.

If the commission disapproves the application for release of the bond or portion thereof, the commission shall state the reasons for disapproval, recommend corrective actions necessary to secure said release, and provide the permittee with an opportunity for a formal public hearing pursuant to the procedures of section 38-14.1-30.

If the commission decides to release the bond either totally or in part, the commission shall notify the county commissioners and the mayors of the municipalities in the county in which the applicable surface coal mining operation is located by certified mail, at least thirty days prior to the actual release of all or a portion of the bond.

The commission may release bond as follows:

When the permittee completes the backfilling, regrading, and drainage control in a bonded area, forty percent of the bond for the area may be released.

After spreading suitable plant growth material or other suitable strata on the regraded land, twenty percent of the bond for the area may be released.

After vegetation is established on the regraded land, additional bond may be released. The commission shall retain sufficient bond to cover third-party revegetation and associated costs for the period set by subsection 18 of section 38-14.1-24, provided:

There may be no release under this subdivision until the requirements of subdivision b of subsection 8 of section 38-14.1-24 are met and prime farmlands are returned to productivity equal to or greater than nonmined prime farmland in the surrounding area under equivalent management practices.

If there is a permanent silt dam impoundment under subsection 7 of section 38-14.1-24, bond may be released if the commission approves the commitments for future maintenance.

When the permittee has successfully completed all surface coal mining and reclamation operations, and after the period set by subsection 18 of section 38-14.1-24, the remaining bond may be released. No bond may be fully released until all reclamation requirements are met.

Until reclamation has been accomplished to the satisfaction of the commission and until the bond has been fully released pursuant to subsection 7, control of the affected lands shall remain in the commission, and the commission may not allow use of the land which is inconsistent with reclamation.

The commission shall make written findings with its ruling to release or not to release all or part of the performance bond or deposit within sixty days from the filing of the request for bond release, if no informal conference or public hearing is held, and if there has been an informal conference or a public hearing, within thirty days thereafter.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 399, § 1; 1987, ch. 436, § 2; 2005, ch. 319, § 1.

38-14.1-18.
Permit application procedures — Notice requirements.

At the time of filing an application for a permit, or for revision of an existing permit, the applicant shall submit to the commission a copy of the applicant’s advertisement of the ownership, precise location, and boundaries of the land proposed to be affected by the permit or permit revision and the location where the application is available for public inspection. Such advertisement must include notification to any person with an interest which is or may be adversely affected that a petition to designate an area as unsuitable for surface coal mining operations that is within the proposed permit area must be filed within thirty days of the last publication of the notice. The permit applicant shall place such advertisement in the official newspaper of each county wherein land to be included within the permit area lies and in other daily newspapers of general circulation in the locality of the proposed surface coal mining operation at least once a week for four consecutive weeks from the date of filing the application for a permit. Affidavits of publication for all advertisements published pursuant to this subsection must be furnished to the commission by the permit applicant.

The permit applicant shall also conduct a search of the records of the county recorder for each county for land within the proposed permit area and shall supply the commission with a list of names and addresses of all owners of surface rights of land within the proposed permit area and a list of all subsurface mineral owners within the proposed permit area. The lists must be submitted to the commission along with the application for a permit or permit revision.

Upon receipt of an application for a permit, or a revision thereof, the commission shall serve notice upon state agencies specified in subsection 2 of section 38-14.1-21, city and county governmental authorities, planning agencies, sewage and water treatment authorities, and water companies in the locality of the proposed surface coal mining operation of the permit applicant’s intent to surface mine the particularly described tract of land, indicating the application’s permit number and where a copy of the proposed mining and reclamation plan may be inspected, and informing them of their right to submit written comments or objections pursuant to this section with respect to the effect of the proposed surface coal mining operations on the environment within their area of responsibility.

In addition, the commission shall send by certified mail to all owners of surface rights of the land to be included within the permit area a notice of the opportunity to submit comments or objections pursuant to this section on the proposed permit application and its effect on the environment and the surface owner. This notice must also inform each surface owner of the surface owner’s right to request an informal conference within the time prescribed in subsection 5 and of the surface owner’s right to request a formal hearing within thirty days of the ruling of the commission pursuant to subsection 3 of section 38-14.1-30.

Any person having an interest which is or may be adversely affected, including state agencies other than the commission, has the right to file written comments or objections to the application for a proposed initial or revised permit and to submit a request for an informal conference pursuant to section 38-14.1-19, provided that the written comments or objections and any request for an informal hearing are made within thirty days after the last publication of the advertisement referred to in subsection 1.

Any comments, objections, and requests for an informal conference must immediately upon receipt be transmitted to the permit applicant by the commission and must be made available to the public at the same location as is the permit application.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 399, § 1; 2001, ch. 120, § 1.

38-14.1-19.
Informal conference procedures.

If written objections or comments are filed and an informal conference is requested as provided in section 38-14.1-17, 38-14.1-18, or 38-14.1-28, the commission shall schedule such informal conference within forty-five days of the receipt of such request but in no event prior to the expiration of the thirty-day period allowed for submission of comments, objections, and requests in subsection 2 of section 38-14.1-17 or subsections 3, 4, and 5 of section 38-14.1-18.

The informal conference must be held in the locality of the proposed mining if the request for such conference so specifies. Date, time, and location of such informal conference must be advertised by the commission in the official newspaper of each county wherein land included in the proposed permit area lies and in other daily newspapers of general circulation in the locality of the proposed surface coal mining operation at least two weeks prior to the scheduled conference date.

Upon request of any party to the informal conference, the commission may arrange with the applicant access by the requesting party to the proposed mining area for the purpose of gathering information relative to such conference.

An electronic or stenographic record must be made of the informal conference proceedings, unless waived by all parties. Such record must be maintained and must be accessible to the parties until final release of the permittee’s performance bond pursuant to this chapter.

In the event all parties requesting the informal conference stipulate agreement prior to the requested informal conference and withdraw their request, such informal conference need not be held.

The commission shall issue its written findings and ruling within thirty days of the informal conference. Along with these findings and ruling, notice must be served upon all persons who were parties to the informal conference, informing them of their right, within thirty days of such service, to request that a formal administrative hearing be held by the commission pursuant to section 38-14.1-30 in order to review the findings and ruling.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 399, § 1; 1983, ch. 411, § 1; 2021, ch. 276, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

38-14.1-20.
Ruling on permit application — Timing and content.

If an informal conference in reference to a permit application has been held pursuant to section 38-14.1-19, the commission shall issue its written findings approving or disapproving the application in whole or in part and stating the reasons for such findings within thirty days of the informal conference. At the time of issuance, copies of the findings, reasons, and the commission’s ruling must be furnished to the permit applicant and all persons who were parties to the informal conference along with the notice of the right to request a formal hearing provided for in section 38-14.1-30.

If no informal conference has been held, the commission shall notify the permit applicant within a reasonable time as set forth in regulations, whether the application has been approved or disapproved in whole or in part along with notice of the right to request a formal hearing pursuant to section 38-14.1-30. In setting such reasonable time, the commission shall take into account the time needed for proper investigation of the site, the complexity of the permit application, and whether objections to the application have been filed.

Under either subsection 1 or 2, if the application is approved, a permit must be issued subject to the right of any person with an interest which is or may be adversely affected to request formal hearing pursuant to section 38-14.1-30; if the application is disapproved, specific reasons therefor must be set forth in the notification of disapproval together with the requirements for approval.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 399, § 1; 1981, ch. 373, § 1.